South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S317.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-220(B) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (54) fifty percent of the fair market value of watercraft as defined in Section 50-23-5. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on January 1, 2026, and first applies to property tax years beginning after 2026. ----XX----